Utah statutes.
63G-7-802.   Insurance -- Liability insurance -- Government vehicles operated by employees outside scope of employment.

(1)  A governmental entity that owns vehicles driven by an employee of the governmental entity with the express or implied consent of the entity, but which, at the time liability is incurred as a result of an automobile accident, is not being driven and used within the course and scope of the driver's employment is, subject to Subsection (2), considered to provide the driver with the insurance coverage required by Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act.

(2)  The liability coverages considered provided are the minimum limits under Section 31A-22-304.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

